Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4901
Judicial proceedings; bond not required.

No bond for costs, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village or of any officer, member of any board or commission, head of any department, agent, or employee of such city or village in any proceeding or court action in which such city, village, officer, board or commission member, department head, agent, or employee is a party litigant in its, his, or her official capacity.

Laws 2001, LB 104, § 1.